Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 4 Municipal Gas Authority of Georgia

46-4-80.
Legislative findings; declaration of need.

The General Assembly finds that certain political subdivisions of this state now own and operate gas distribution systems to serve their citizens, inhabitants, and customers by providing them with gas for all purposes; and if such political subdivisions are to furnish, and if the members of the public in the areas they serve are to receive, adequate service, such political subdivisions must have adequate, dependable, and economical sources of gas supplies. The General Assembly declares that there exists in this state a need for an authority to function without profit in developing and promoting for the public good in this state adequate, dependable, and economical sources and supplies of gas for the purposes expressed in this Code section, and to assist in the financing of additions and other expenditures for the municipal gas systems of such political subdivisions.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-81.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Authority” means the Municipal Gas Authority of Georgia and any successor thereto. Any change in name or composition of the authority shall in no way affect the vested rights of any person under this article or impair the obligations of any contracts existing under this article.

“Bond anticipation notes” or “notes” means obligations issued after validation of bonds and in anticipation of the issuance of the bonds as validated.

“Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means any bonds issued by the authority under this article, including refunding bonds.

“Cost of project” or “cost of construction” means all costs of construction; all costs of real and personal property required for the purposes of such project and facilities related thereto, including land and any leases, rights or undivided interest therein, easements, franchises, water rights, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates, and the securing of such permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and the preparation of applications therefor, and including all machinery and equipment, including equipment for use in connection with such construction; financing charges; working capital; interest prior to and during construction and during such additional period as the authority may determine; operating expenses during such period as the authority may determine; costs of engineering, architectural, and legal services; costs of plans and specifications and all expenses necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; costs of insurance or of self-insuring any project; administrative expenses; amounts payable under any judgment against the authority; disposal costs; all costs associated with acquiring contract rights or other contractual arrangements for the short-term or long-term provision of gas supplies, including reserves, transmission, storage, peaking, or other services associated therewith, including prepayments for such; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing authorized by this article. All funds paid or advanced for any of the purposes mentioned in this paragraph by political subdivisions contracting with the authority prior to the issuance of any of the authority’s bonds or notes may be refunded to such political subdivisions out of the proceeds of any bonds or notes so issued. The costs of any project may also include a fund or funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, and such other reserves as may be reasonably required by the authority for the operation of its projects and as may be authorized by any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of any such bonds or bond anticipation notes may be authorized. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the purposes mentioned in this paragraph shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of revenue bonds or notes issued under this article for such project.

“Distribution” means the conveyance of gas to the ultimate consumer.

“Election committee” means the Municipal Gas Authority of Georgia Membership Election Committee, as created in Code Section 46-4-83.

“Exploration” means the processes, properties, activities, and facilities used for the discovery of deposits of gas, and the study and implementation of enhanced gas recovery methods.

“Gas” means either natural or synthetic gas, including propane, manufactured, methane from coal beds, geothermal gas, or any mixture thereof, whether in gaseous or liquid form, or any byproduct resulting therefrom.

“Production” means the physical activities, processes, properties, and facilities for development, manufacture, synthesis, production, coal gasification, extraction, gathering, or storage of gas or conversion of one form of gas to another.

“Project,” “undertaking,” or “facility” means any plant, works, system, facility, and real and personal property of any nature whatsoever, together with all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, and any contract rights, relating to the storage, acquisition, exploration, production, distribution, enrichment, transmission, purchase, sale, exchange, or interchange of gas and relating to the acquisition, extraction, conversion, transportation, storage, or reprocessing of fuel of any kind for any such purposes, or any interest in, or right to the use, services, enrichment, output, or capacity of any such plant, works, system, or facilities. “Project” or “undertaking” as used in this paragraph is intended to include contracts and contract rights as well as tangible property.

“Storage” means any process, properties, activities, or facilities used to hold, store, or maintain gas.

“System” means those properties, facilities, projects, contractual rights, or combination thereof of the authority which are designated by the authority as constituting a specific combination for the purposes of financing such or for the purposes of providing gas supplies or services to a specified group of political subdivisions or to a specified geographic area.

“Transmission” means the transfer of gas from its acquisition site to, between, or among cities or municipal gas agencies or other persons with whom they may contract, but does not include distribution, except where incidental or necessary to transmission.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-82.
Creation of authority; principal office; legal situs.

There is created a public body corporate and politic to be known as the Municipal Gas Authority of Georgia, which shall be a public corporation of the State of Georgia and which shall have perpetual existence. The authority, however, shall not be a political subdivision of the state but shall be an instrumentality of the state, a mere creature of the state, having distinct corporate entity and being exempt from Article 2 of Chapter 17 of Title 50.

The authority shall have its principal office either in Fulton County or in a county contiguous to Fulton County. The authority’s residence for the purposes of this article shall be either Fulton County or such other county contiguous to Fulton County. If the authority designates a county other than Fulton County as its principal office, notice of such designation shall be given in writing to the Secretary of State and the address of such designated office shall be available for public inspection in the office of the Secretary of State.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 471, § 1.

46-4-83.
Membership election committee; election of members of the authority.

The authority shall consist of nine members. The first nine members shall be elected as provided in this Code section.

On or before June 16, 1987, each of those political subdivisions which have, prior to such date, by proper resolution of their respective governing bodies, declared their intention to contract with the authority for the purchase of all or some substantial portion of its gas supply (other than short-term purchases) shall designate one person, who shall be a resident of the State of Georgia, as its representative on a body to be known as the “Municipal Gas Authority of Georgia Membership Election Committee,” provided that at least five political subdivisions have declared their intention to contract with the authority. All such resolutions of declaration of intention to contract with the authority shall be presented to the election committee at its first meeting, which shall be held in the office of the Georgia Municipal Association at 11:00 A.M. on June 23, 1987.

At its first meeting, the election committee shall organize and shall elect a chairman and such other officers as may be desirable in the determination of the election committee. The election committee shall then determine the sufficiency of the resolutions presented to it and shall determine the number of votes (including fractions thereof) which each representative to the election committee shall be entitled to cast in accordance with Code Section 46-4-87. Nominations for membership on the authority shall then be received by the election committee prior to adjournment of its first meeting.

The election committee shall then meet for the second time on June 30, 1987, at the same time and at a place designated by the election committee at its initial meeting to receive any other nominations to the authority that may be made. A vote shall then be taken; and the nine nominees receiving the largest number of votes cast by a quorum of the election committee, as such quorum is determined by subsection (c) of Code Section 46-4-87, shall be declared the first nine members of the authority. Insofar as may be consistent with the remaining provisions of this Code section, in the election of the first nine members, the three nominees receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected to terms of three years; the three nominees receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected to terms of two years; and the three nominees receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected to terms of one year. Any tie votes shall be resolved by lot in such manner as shall be prescribed by the election committee.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section to the contrary, in the event it should be mathematically necessary in the election of the members of the authority for two members to be residents of the same political subdivision, then one of the two members who are residents of the same political subdivision shall be elected for an initial term of one year. In the event there are four political subdivisions from which two residents must be elected, one of the residents of one of such political subdivisions shall be elected for an initial term of two years.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-84.
Authority members — Representation of political subdivisions; eligibility of election committee members; successive terms.

Each member of the authority shall be a resident of one of the political subdivisions represented on the election committee; provided, however, that an employee of the gas department or utility commission of a political subdivision represented on the election committee shall be qualified to be a member of the authority even though not a resident of one of the political subdivisions so represented for so long as he or she remains such an employee; but, insofar as is mathematically possible, no two members shall be residents or employees of the same political subdivision.
Representatives to the election committee shall be eligible for membership on the authority. Members shall be eligible to succeed themselves.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1055, § 1.

46-4-85.
Authority members — Terms of office.

Upon the expiration of the terms of the first members of the authority, members shall be elected for three-year terms, provided that in the year in which a member’s term is to expire, the term shall not expire until the adjournment of the annual meeting for that year and until a successor is elected. The election committee shall meet at a date not more than 30 days prior to each annual meeting of the authority and shall elect members to fill the terms which will expire at the conclusion of such annual meeting.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 46.

46-4-86.
Election committee members.

Each political subdivision contracting with the authority for all or a substantial portion of its gas supply (other than short-term purchases) following the election of the first nine members of the authority shall designate a representative to the election committee no more than 30 days following the execution of such contract by and between the authority and such political subdivision. The term of such additional representative shall begin with the next meeting of the election committee.

Representatives to the election committee shall serve at the pleasure of the governing body of the political subdivision which appointed them.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-86

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-87.
Weighted vote of election committee members; quorum for election committee.

In elections held by the election committee to elect members to the authority, each political subdivision entitled to representation on the election committee shall have and shall be entitled to have its representative on the election committee cast: (1) one whole vote; (2) plus an additional vote or votes (including fractions thereof) to be determined by arriving at a percentage by dividing the number of MCF per day of contract demand purchased by the respective political subdivision during the immediately preceding calendar year by the total number of MCF per day of contract demand purchased by all such political subdivisions during the immediately preceding calendar year and applying such percentage to the total number of political subdivisions entitled to representation on the election committee; and (3) plus an additional vote or votes (including fractions thereof) to be determined by arriving at a percentage by dividing the annual quantity of MCF purchased by the respective political subdivision during the immediately preceding calendar year by the total of the annual quantities of MCF purchased by all such political subdivisions during the immediately preceding calendar year and applying such percentage to the total number of political subdivisions entitled to representation on the election committee.

At such time as contracts or facilities of the authority are placed in commercial operation, as determined by the authority, and gas is being supplied by the authority to political subdivisions contracting with the authority, then and thereafter each such political subdivision entitled to representation on the election committee shall have and shall be entitled to have its representative on the election committee cast: (1) one whole vote; (2) plus an additional vote or votes (including fractions thereof) to be determined by arriving at a percentage by dividing the number of MCF per day of contract demand purchased from the authority by the respective political subdivision during the immediately preceding calendar year by the total number of MCF per day of contract demand purchased from the authority by all such political subdivisions during the immediately preceding calendar year and applying such percentage to the total number of political subdivisions entitled to representation on the election committee; and (3) plus an additional vote or votes (including fractions thereof) to be determined by arriving at a percentage by dividing the annual quantity of MCF purchased from the authority by the respective political subdivisions during the immediately preceding calendar year by the total of the annual quantities of MCF purchased from the authority by all such political subdivisions during the immediately preceding calendar year and applying such percentage to the total number of political subdivisions entitled to representation on the election committee.

The presence at any meeting of the election committee of representatives entitled to cast two-thirds of the total votes to which the election committee shall be entitled shall constitute a quorum of the election committee. The authority is authorized to round fractional votes to the nearest 1/1000.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-87

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-88.
Vacancies in membership of authority.

Any vacancy in the membership of the authority shall be filled by a new member who shall be elected by the remaining members of the authority and who shall serve until the next meeting of the election committee. At the first meeting of the election committee following the filling of such vacancy, the election committee shall elect a member to fill the remainder, if any, of the unexpired term for which such vacancy was filled. Upon such election by the election committee, the membership on the authority of the member previously elected by the remaining members of the authority to fill such vacancy shall terminate.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-88

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-89.
Officers.

The authority shall elect from among its membership a chairman, a vice chairman, a secretary-treasurer, and an assistant secretary-treasurer. Such officers shall serve for such terms as shall be prescribed by resolution of the authority or until their successors are elected and qualified.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-89

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-90.
Quorum; majority vote.

At all meetings of the authority, the presence in person of a majority of the members in office shall be necessary for the transaction of business, and the affirmative vote of a majority of the members then in office shall be necessary for any action of the authority. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of such majority to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority. If at any meeting there is less than a majority present, a majority of those present may adjourn the meeting to a fixed time and place, and notice of such time and place shall be given in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 46-4-91, provided that if the time element of subsection (c) of Code Section 46-4-91 cannot reasonably be complied with, such notice, if any, of such adjourned meeting shall be given as is reasonably practicable.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-91.
Annual and special meetings.

The annual meeting of the authority shall be held on the anniversary date of the first meeting of the authority unless the date, time, and place of such annual meeting shall otherwise be fixed by resolution of the authority.

Special meetings of the authority may be called by resolution of the authority, by the chairman or vice chairman, or upon the written request of at least three members of the authority.

Written notice of all meetings shall be delivered to each political subdivision contracting with the authority and to each member of the authority not less than ten days prior to the date of such meeting in the case of regular meetings and not less than three days prior to the date of such meeting in the case of special meetings.

Notice of a meeting of the authority need not be given to any member who signs a waiver of notice either before or after the meeting. Attendance of a member at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting and a waiver of any and all objections to the place or time of the meeting or to the manner in which it has been called or convened, except when a member states at the beginning of the meeting any such objection or objections to the transaction of business. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the authority need be specified in the notice or the waiver of notice of such meetings.

In addition to the annual meeting of the authority, regular meetings of the authority may be established by resolution of the authority; and no notice, other than notice of the adoption of such resolution conveyed to any member of the authority who was absent when it was adopted, shall be required for such meeting, except for the notice required by subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-91

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-92.
Compensation; expenses; personnel.

The members of the authority shall not be entitled to compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed by the authority for their actual expenses properly incurred in the performance of their duties. The authority shall make rules and regulations for its own government and may retain, employ, and engage all necessary staff and personnel, including professional and technical supervisors, assistants, and experts and other agents and employees, whether temporary or permanent, as it may require. Any one or more of such persons so engaged may be designated as an additional assistant secretary-treasurer of the authority and may be given the duties of keeping the books, records, and minutes of the authority; of giving all notices required by Code Sections 46-4-90, 46-4-91, and 46-4-93; and, in the absence of or in lieu of the secretary-treasurer, of performing all other functions of the secretary-treasurer. Officers designated by the authority pursuant to this Code section shall serve at the pleasure of the authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-92

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-93.
Removal of authority members from office.

The election committee shall have the power to remove from office any member of the authority for cause after written notice and public hearing.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-93

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-94.
Records required.

The authority shall keep suitable books and records of all its obligations, contracts, transactions, and undertakings; of all income and receipts of every nature; and of all expenditures of every kind.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-94

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-95.
Purpose.

The purpose of the authority shall be: (1) to acquire or construct, or to acquire and construct, and to operate and maintain, or to cause to be constructed, operated, and maintained, systems, projects, and facilities for the storage, acquisition, exploration, production, distribution, transmission, purchase, sale, exchange, or interchange of gas; and (2) in addition thereto, to take all other necessary or desirable actions in order to provide or make available an adequate, dependable, and economical supply of gas and related services to those political subdivisions of this state identified in Code Section 46-4-100 which may desire the same and, incidentally and so as to take advantage of economies of scale, in the storage, acquisition, exploration, production, distribution, transmission, purchase, sale, exchange, or interchange of gas to other persons and entities.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-95

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-96.
Powers.

The authority shall have all powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purpose and provisions of this article including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

To sue and be sued in contract and in tort and to complain and defend in all courts;

To adopt and to alter a corporate seal;

To acquire in its own name, inside and outside this state, real property or rights and easements therein and franchises and personal property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes, by purchase, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain in accordance with any and all existing laws of the State of Georgia applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, including the power to proceed as a condemning body under Article 2 of Chapter 2 of Title 22 or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise; to insure the same against any and all risks as such insurance may, from time to time, be available; and to use such property, rent or lease the same to or from others, make contracts with respect to the use thereof, or sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any such property in any manner it deems to the best advantage of the authority and the purposes thereof. The power to acquire, use, and dispose of property provided in this paragraph shall include the power to acquire, use, and dispose of any interest in such property, whether divided or undivided, which acquisition may result in the ownership of such property or any part thereof in common with any other party, whether public or private. Title to any such property of the authority, however, shall be held by the authority exclusively for the benefit of the public. The authority shall be under no obligation to accept and pay for any property condemned under this article except from the funds provided under the authority of this article and, in any proceedings to condemn, such orders may be made by the court having jurisdiction of the action as may be just to the authority and to the owners of the property to be condemned. If the authority shall deem it expedient to construct any project on lands which are subject to the control of the state or of any political subdivision or public corporation of the state, the appropriate state authorities, in the case of lands controlled by the state, or the governing authorities of such political subdivisions or such public corporations are authorized to convey such lands to the authority for such consideration, not exceeding reasonable value, as may be agreed upon by the authority, as grantee, and by the appropriate state authorities or by the governing body of such political subdivision or by such public corporation, as grantor, taking into consideration the public benefit to be derived from such conveyance;

To appoint and select officers, agents, and employees, including engineering, architectural, and construction experts, fiscal agents, and attorneys, and to fix their compensation;

To acquire, by purchase or otherwise, in whole or in part, inside or outside this state, as provided in paragraph (3) of this Code section, and to place into operation and operate or cause to be placed into operation and operated, either as owner of all or of any part in common with others or as agent, facilities and projects for the storage, acquisition, exploration, production, distribution, transmission, purchase, sale, exchange, or interchange of gas; to acquire and to provide, by sale or otherwise, an adequate, dependable, and economical gas supply to political subdivisions of this state contracting with the authority pursuant to the authority of Code Section 46-4-100; and, through such political subdivisions, to supply such gas to the members of the public in the areas served by them; and, as agent for such political subdivisions, to secure gas contracts and arrangements with other persons. The authority shall also have the power, which may be exercised either as principal or as agent, to manufacture, store, and transmit gas for light, heat, power, and energy; to manufacture, buy, sell, import, export, lease, or otherwise acquire and generally deal in gas apparatuses of all kinds and machinery and devices and materials and fossil fuels for the manufacture, storage, and transmission of gas for light, heat, power, and energy; to purchase gas at retail or wholesale from any other person; to purchase or construct part of the capacity of projects or facilities sponsored and owned by or in common with others, making any such purchase at wholesale or retail inside or outside this state; to contract for the purchase of gas from, or the sale of gas to, the United States government and gas utility systems either privately or publicly owned, inside or outside this state; to execute long-term or short-term gas purchase or sale contracts on terms which may include agreements with respect to resale rates and the disposition of revenues; to interchange, exchange, store, and purchase gas from any person; to erect, buy, lease, or otherwise acquire, operate, and maintain gas lighting and heating projects; to transmit gas both for itself and on behalf of others; to erect, buy, sell, lease, or otherwise acquire, maintain, and operate or cause to be maintained and operated plants, underground subways, conduits, and pipelines above, upon, and under the streets, alleys, lands, and territories of political subdivisions, public or private corporations, or individuals; and to continue to sell gas to political subdivisions of this state which are authorized to contract with the authority pursuant to Code Section 46-4-100 and to other persons and entities inside or outside this state and, as agent for any or all of the same, to make gas otherwise available to them through arrangements with other persons, all in the exercise of the powers of the authority and to effectuate the purposes of this article;

To designate one or more systems in effectuating any of its purposes;

To contract with the state and its agencies, instrumentalities, and departments; with those political subdivisions of the state which are authorized to contract with the authority pursuant to Code Section 46-4-100; and with private persons and corporations inside or outside this state. This power includes the making of contracts for the construction of projects, which contracts for construction may be made either as sole owner of the project or as owner, in common with other public or private persons, of any divided or undivided interest therein; and is further intended to include, without limitation, the making of contracts for the purchase, sale, exchange, interchange, pooling, transmission, distribution, or storage of gas and fuel of any kind for any such purposes, inside and outside the State of Georgia, in such amounts as it shall determine to be necessary and appropriate to make the most effective use of its powers and to meet its responsibilities, on such terms and for such period of time, not exceeding 50 years, as the authority shall determine; and is further intended to include, without limitation, the making of contracts for furnishing gas supply development services and management services to political subdivisions contracting with the authority pursuant to Code Section 46-4-100.

To exercise any one or more of the powers, rights, and privileges conferred by this article either alone or jointly or in common with one or more other parties or utilities, whether public or private. In any such exercise of such powers, rights, and privileges jointly or in common with others with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of gas projects or facilities, the authority may own an undivided interest in such facilities with any other parties, whether public or private. The authority may enter into agreements with respect to any such gas exploration, storage, manufacturing, distribution, or transmission facility with the other parties participating therein, and any such agreement may contain such terms, conditions, and provisions consistent with this article as the parties thereto shall deem to be in their best interests. Any such agreement may include, but need not be limited to, provisions for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such gas exploration, storage, manufacturing, or transmission facility by any one or more of the parties to such agreement, which party or parties shall be designated in or pursuant to such agreement as agent or agents on behalf of itself and one or more of the other parties thereto, or by such other means as may be determined by the parties thereto. Such an agreement may also include provisions for methods of determining and allocating among or between the parties the costs of construction, operation, maintenance, renewals, replacements, improvements, and disposals with respect to such facility. In carrying out its functions and activities as such agent with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility, such agent shall be governed by the laws and regulations applicable to such agent as a separate legal entity, and not by any laws or regulations which may be applicable to any of the other participating parties. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, pursuant to the terms of any such agreement, the authority may delegate its powers and duties with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility to the party acting as agent; and all actions taken by such agent in accordance with the provisions of such agreement may be made binding upon the authority without further action or approval by the authority;

To accept, receive, and administer gifts, grants, appropriations, and donations of moneys, materials, and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States government or the State of Georgia or any agency, department, authority, or instrumentality of either, upon such terms and conditions as the United States government, the State of Georgia, or such agency, department, authority, or instrumentality shall impose; to administer trusts; and to sell, lease, transfer, convey, appropriate, and pledge any and all of its property and assets;

To invest any accumulation of its funds and any sinking fund or reserves in any manner that the authority considers prudent, including entering into hedging, options, and future transactions, notwithstanding any other law of this state relating to investment of public funds, and to purchase its own bonds and notes;

To employ such investment and money-management techniques as the authority shall determine to be prudent and not inconsistent with this article or the other laws of the state;

To do any and all things necessary to reduce the cost of gas furnished to political subdivisions contracting with the authority including, without limitation, entering into interest rate swaps and other arrangements for restructuring the authority’s capitalization;

To provide management, technical, financial, informational, promotional, and educational services to and for the benefit of the political subdivisions;

To do any and all things necessary or proper for the accomplishment of the objectives of this article and to exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state, including:

Employment of professional and administrative staff and personnel and retaining of legal, engineering, and other professional services;

The purchase of all kinds of insurance, including, without limitation, insurance against tort liability and against risks of damage to property;

The borrowing of money for any of the corporate purposes of the authority, provided that obligations of the authority other than revenue bonds for which provision is made in this article shall be payable from funds of the authority other than any special fund allocated to the payment of revenue bonds, and shall not be a charge against such special fund;

The power to indemnify and hold harmless any parties contracting with the authority or its agents from damage to persons or property; and

The power to act as self-insurer with respect to any loss or liability; and

To issue its revenue bonds as provided in this article in evidence of its indebtedness incurred with respect to the powers described in this article, such bonds to be payable from the revenues, receipts, and earnings of the projects or systems of the authority and other available funds thereof; to execute trust agreements or indentures; to sell, convey, pledge, and assign any and all of its funds, assets, property, and income as security for the payment of such revenue bonds; and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the owners thereof.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the authority shall not have the power or authority to engage in the distribution or sale of gas or the transmission of gas to an ultimate consumer thereof, irrespective of whether such consumer is a public or private person or other entity, and irrespective of whether the authority acts alone, in conjunction with, on behalf of, or as an agent for another or others in any such transaction.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-96

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to §

28-9-5

, in 1987, a comma was inserted following “such agreement” in the last sentence of paragraph (a)(8), and “indemnify” was substituted for “idemnify” in subparagraph (a)(14)(D).

46-4-97.
Not for profit operation.

The authority shall not operate or construct any project for profit, except insofar as any such profit will inure to the benefit of the public. The authority shall fix the rates, fees, and charges consistent with this declaration of policy such as will produce revenues only in amounts sufficient, together with all other funds of the authority, to pay the principal or purchase price of and premium, if any, and interest on bonds and all other indebtedness and contractual obligations of the authority; to provide for maintenance and operation of the authority and of its projects; to provide for payment of any judgment against the authority; and to maintain such reserves as shall have been created in amounts sufficient in the judgment of the authority for the security of the bonds and other obligations; and for the improvement, replacement, or expansion of the facilities or services of the authority or to provide fuel for its projects.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-97

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.